Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-679
Application; Chief Water Officer; determination as to completeness.

Within thirty days of the receipt of an application made under section 46-677, the Chief Water Officer shall accept the application as a completed application or return the application to the applicant as an incomplete application. If the application is deemed to be incomplete, the Chief Water Officer shall inform the applicant as to the deficiencies in the application.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 193.